Utah statutes.
58-57-11.   Provision for current practitioners.

Any person who is engaged in the practice of respiratory care as defined in Section 58-57-2 and who is not licensed under this chapter as a respiratory care practitioner, shall by January 1, 2007, obtain a license under this chapter unless exempt from licensure under the provisions of Section 58-1-307 or 58-57-7.



Amended by Chapter 106, 2006 General Session

